Utah statutes.
17-41-403.   Nuisances.

(1)  Each political subdivision shall ensure that any of its laws or ordinances that define or prohibit a public nuisance exclude from the definition or prohibition:

(a)  for an agriculture protection area, any agricultural activity or operation within an agriculture protection area conducted using sound agricultural practices unless that activity or operation bears a direct relationship to public health or safety; or

(b)  for an industrial protection area, any industrial use of the land within the industrial protection area that is consistent with sound practices applicable to the industrial use, unless that use bears a direct relationship to public health or safety.

(2)  In a civil action for nuisance or a criminal action for public nuisance under Section 76-10-803, it is a complete defense if the action involves agricultural activities and those agricultural activities were:

(a)  conducted within an agriculture protection area; and

(b)  not in violation of any federal, state, or local law or regulation relating to the alleged nuisance or were conducted according to sound agricultural practices.

(3) (a)  A vested mining use undertaken in conformity with applicable federal and state law and regulations is presumed to be operating within sound mining practices.

(b)  A vested mining use that is consistent with sound mining practices:

(i)  is presumed to be reasonable; and

(ii)  may not constitute a private or public nuisance under Section 76-10-803.

(c)  A vested mining use in operation for more than three years may not be considered to have become a private or public nuisance because of a subsequent change in the condition of land within the vicinity of the vested mining use.

(4) (a)  For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 300 feet of the boundary of an agriculture protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:

"Agriculture Protection Area

This property is located in the vicinity of an established agriculture protection area in which normal agricultural uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that such agricultural uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the agriculture protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal agricultural uses and activities."

(b)  For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of an industrial protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:

"Industrial Protection Area

This property is located in the vicinity of an established industrial protection area in which normal industrial uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that such industrial uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the industrial protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience which may result from such normal industrial uses and activities."

(c)  For any new subdivision development located in whole or in part within 1,000 feet of the boundary of a mining protection area, the owner of the development shall provide notice on any plat filed with the county recorder the following notice:

"This property is located within the vicinity of an established mining protection area in which normal mining uses and activities have been afforded the highest priority use status.  It can be anticipated that the mining uses and activities may now or in the future be conducted on property included in the mining protection area.  The use and enjoyment of this property is expressly conditioned on acceptance of any annoyance or inconvenience that may result from the normal mining uses and activities."

